Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 907.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) The offense is a violation of section 728.12. House File 2515, p. 2 Sec. 2. Section 907.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . i. A sentence imposed pursuant to section 728.12. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2515, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor